South Dakota, session 2026, HB1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 60-2:
Every employer, as defined in § 61-1-4, with more than fifty employees, after
hiring an employee, shall, within twenty days of the employee's first day of work, verify
the employment eligibility of the employee through the United States Department of
Homeland Security's e-verify program, and shall keep a record of the verification for the
duration of the employee's employment.
An employer is not liable for failure to timely comply with this section if the e-verify
program is temporarily unavailable. Once the e-verify program becomes available again
following a temporary pause, the employer has twenty days to verify the employment
eligibility through the e-verify program.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 60-2:
The attorney general may, upon receipt of a complaint, investigate an alleged
violation of section 1 of this Act. If the attorney general deems the complaint meritorious
and receives written confirmation from the United States Department of Homeland
Security or the United States Department of Justice that an employer has knowingly
employed an unauthorized person in violation of federal immigration law, the attorney
general may recover a civil penalty of two-thousand dollars for each violation. The
attorney general shall forward to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund any
civil penalty recovered pursuant to this section.
An employer who uses the e-verify in good faith and maintains the verification
record is not liable for any civil penalty arising from an employee's work authorization. An
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.765.11 2 1209
employer is not liable for the actions of a third-party staffing agency, subcontractor, or
labor contractor, unless the employer knowingly participated in a violation.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 60-2:
Any individual may not knowingly submit false information or documents to an
employer to evade determination of employment eligibility under the e-verify program.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.